Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1938
Admission of members.

(a) The articles or bylaws may establish criteria or procedures for admission of members.

(b) No person shall be admitted as a member without his or her consent.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 38.